nl: Rugby variant: Rugby league; Rugby sevens; Rugby union; Tag rugby; Touch rugby; Universeel; Overig
pt-BR: Rúgbi variante: Rugby League; Rugby Sevens; Rugby Union; Tag Rugby; Touch Rugby; Universal; Outros
el: Παραλλαγή του ράγκμπι: Rugby League; Rugby Sevens; Rugby Union; Tag Rugby; Touch Rugby; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
sl-SI: Različica ragbija: Ragbi 13 (Rugby League); Ragbi 7 (Rugby Sevens); Ragbi 15 (Rugby Union); Tag ragbi; Touch ragbi; Univerzalna; Drugo
ro-RO: Varianta de rugby: Rugby League; Rugby în 7; Rugby Union; Tag Rugby; Touch Rugby; Universal; Altele
pl: Odmiana rugby: Rugby league; Rugby 7; Rugby union; Tag rugby; Touch rugby; Uniwersalne; Inne
de: Rugby-Variante: Rugby League; Siebener-Rugby; Rugby Union; Tag Rugby; Touch Rugby; Universal; Sonstiges
ko: 럭비 유형: 럭비 리그; 7인제 럭비; 럭비 유니언; 태그 럭비; 터치 럭비; 유니버설; 기타
nb: Rugbyvariant: Rugby league; Sjumannsrugby; Rugby union; Tag rugby; Touch rugby; Universell; Annet
it: Variante di rugby: Rugby League; Rugby a 7; Rugby Union; Tag Rugby; Touch Rugby; Universale; Altro
ru: Вариант регби: Регбилиг; Регби-7; Регби-15; Тэг-регби; Тач-регби; Универсальный; Другое
cs: Varianta ragby: Rugby League; Sedmičkové ragby; Rugby Union; Tag ragby; Touch ragby; Univerzální; Jiné
da: Rugbyvariant: Rugby league; Rugby sevens; Rugby union; Tag rugby; Touch rugby; Universal; Andet
fr: Variante de rugby: Rugby à XIII; Rugby à sept; Rugby à XV; Tag rugby; Touch rugby; Universel; Autre
sk-SK: Ragbyový variant: Rugby League; Sedmičkové ragby; Rugby Union; Tag Rugby; Touch Rugby; Univerzálne; Iné
bg-BG: Вариант на ръгби: Ръгби лийг; Ръгби 7; Ръгби юниън; Таг ръгби; Тъч ръгби; Универсално; Друго
pt-PT: Variante de râguebi: Rugby League; Rugby Sevens; Rugby Union; Tag Rugby; Touch Rugby; Universal; Outro
lt-LT: Regbio variantas: Regbio lyga; Regbis-7; Regbio sąjunga (klasikinis regbis); Bekontaktis regbis („Tag Rugby“); Bekontaktis regbis („Touch Rugby“); Universalus; Kita
tr: Ragbi varyantı: Ragbi ligi; Yedili ragbi; Ragbi birliği; Tag ragbi; Touch ragbi; Evrensel; Diğer
ja: ラグビーのバリエーション: ラグビーリーグ; 7人制ラグビー; ラグビーユニオン; タグラグビー; タッチラグビー; ユニバーサル; その他
th: รักบี้เห็นสินค้า: รักบี้ลีก; รักบี้เซเวนส์; รักบี้ยูเนียน; แท็กรักบี้; ทัชรักบี้; สากล; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 橄榄球变体: 联盟式橄榄球; 七人制橄榄球; 联合式橄榄球; 拔旗橄榄球; 触式橄榄球; 通用; 其他
hr-HR: Varijanta ragbija: Ragbi 13 (Rugby League); Ragbi 7 (Rugby Sevens); Ragbi 15 (Rugby Union); Tag ragbi; Touch ragbi; Univerzalno; Ostalo
fi: Rugbyn pelimuoto: Rugby league; Rugby sevens; Rugby union; Tag rugby; Touch rugby; Yleinen; Muu
en: Rugby variant: Rugby League; Rugby Sevens; Rugby Union; Tag Rugby; Touch Rugby; Universal; Other
es: Variante de rugby: Rugby league; Rugby 7; Rugby union; Tag rugby; Touch rugby; Universal; Otro
zh-TW: 橄欖球子類: 聯盟式橄欖球; 七人制橄欖球; 聯合式橄欖球; 標籤式橄欖球; 帶式/觸摸式橄欖球; 通用; 其他
vi: Mẫu mã bóng rugby: Rugby League; Rugby 7 người; Rugby Union; Tag Rugby; Touch Rugby; Phổ thông; Khác
sv: Rugbyvariant: Rugby league; Sjumannarugby; Rugby union; Tag-rugby; Touch-rugby; Universell; Övrigt
hu: Rögbiváltozat: Rugby league; Hetes rögbi; Rugby union; Szalagos rögbi; Érintős rögbi; Univerzális; Egyéb